Maryland, session 2026, SB0139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
8–309.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of Title 2 of this article, the Commissioner
may deny a registration to an applicant or refuse to renew, suspend, or revoke the
registration of a registrant if the applicant or registrant:
(1) makes a material misstatement in an application for registration;
(2) fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a registration
for the applicant or registrant or for another;
(3) has been convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor involving moral
turpitude;
(4) in connection with the administration of a plan or with activities on
behalf of a life insurer, commits fraud or engages in illegal or dishonest activities; [or]
(5) [violates any provision of this subtitle or a regulation adopted under it]
HAS VIOLATED THIS ARTICLE OR ANOTHER LAW OF THE STATE THAT RELATES TO
INSURANCE; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 142 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) KNOWINGLY FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A REGULATION ADOPTED BY
OR AN ORDER OF THE COMMISSIONER.
8–320.
(c) (1) In addition to any other enforcement action taken by the Commissioner
under this section, the Commissioner may impose a civil penalty of not more than $10,000
for each violation of this [subtitle] ARTICLE COMMITTED BY AN ADMINISTRATOR.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner
may impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,000 per day for each day that a person is in
violation of § 8–303(a) of this subtitle.
(3) In determining the amount of the civil penalty imposed under this
subsection, the Commissioner shall consider:
(i) the seriousness of the violation;
(ii) the good faith of the violator;
(iii) the violator’s history of previous violations;
(iv) the deleterious effect of the violation on the plan and its
participants and beneficiaries;
(v) the assets of the violator; and
(vi) any other factors that relate to the determination of a financial
penalty.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –